Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 66.24.690 and 2021 c 6 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a caterer's license to sell spirits, beer, and wine, by the individual serving, at retail, for consumption on the premises at an event location that is either owned, leased, or operated either by the caterer or the sponsor of the event for which catering services are being provided. ((If the event is))The event may be open to the public, ((it must be sponsored by a society or organization as defined in RCW 66.24.375. If))or attendance at the event ((is))may be limited to members or invited guests of the sponsoring individual, society, ((or)) organization, ((the requirement that the sponsor must be a society or organization as defined in RCW 66.24.375 is waived))corporation, business, or other for-profit or nonprofit entity. The licensee must serve food as required by rules of the board.(2)(a) The annual fee is two hundred dollars for the beer license, two hundred dollars for the wine license, or four hundred dollars for a combination beer and wine license. The annual fee for a combined beer, wine, and spirits license is one thousand dollars.(b) The annual fees in (a) of this subsection are waived during the 12-month period beginning with the second calendar month after February 28, 2021, for:(i) Licenses that expire during the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(b); and(ii) Licenses issued to persons previously licensed under this section at any time during the 12-month period prior to the 12-month waiver period under this subsection (2)(b).(c) The waivers in (b) of this subsection do not apply to any licensee that:(i) Had their license suspended by the board for health and safety violations of state COVID-19 guidelines; or(ii) Received an order of immediate restraint or citation from the department of labor and industries for allowing an employee to perform work where business activity was prohibited in violation of an emergency proclamation of the governor under RCW 43.06.220.(d) Upon request of the department of revenue, the board and the department of labor and industries must both provide a list of persons that they have determined to be ineligible for a fee waiver under (b) of this subsection for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection. Unless otherwise agreed, any list must be received by the department of revenue no later than 15 calendar days after the request is made.(3) The holder of this license shall notify the board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location of any catered event at which liquor will be served, sold, or consumed. The board shall create rules detailing notification requirements. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the board all necessary or requested information concerning the individual, society, ((or)) organization, corporation, business, or other for-profit or nonprofit entity, that will be holding the catered function at which the caterer's liquor license will be utilized.(4) The holder of this license may, under conditions established by the board, store liquor on other premises operated by the licensee so long as the other premises are owned or controlled by a leasehold interest by that licensee.(5) The holder of this license is prohibited from catering events at locations that are already licensed to sell liquor under this chapter.(6) The holder of this license is responsible for all sales, service, and consumption of alcohol at the location of the catered event.--- END ---